North Carolina, session 2025, HB230.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 8 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 14-32.6. Habitual domestic violence.
(a) A person commits the offense of habitual domestic violence if that person commits
an offense under G.S. 14-32.5, or commits an assault where the person is related to the victim by
one or more of the relationship descriptions set forth in G.S. 14-32.5, and has two or more prior
convictions that include either of the following combination of offenses, with the earlier of the
two prior convictions occurring no more than 15 years prior to the date of the current violation:
(1) Two or more convictions of an offense under G.S. 14-32.5 or an offense
committed in another jurisdiction substantially similar to an offense under
G.S. 14-32.5.
(2) One prior conviction of an offense described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection and at least one prior conviction of an offense in this State or
another jurisdiction involving an assault where the person is related to the
victim by one or more of the relationship descriptions set forth in
G.S. 14-32.5.
(b) A conviction under this section shall not be used as a prior conviction for any other
habitual offense statute. A person convicted of violating this section is guilty of a Class H felony
for the first offense. Subsequent convictions for violating this section shall each be punished at a
level which is one offense class higher than the offense class of the most recent prior conviction
under this section, not to exceed a Class C felony."
SECTION 2. G.S. 15A-401(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Arrest by Officer Without a Warrant. –
…
(2) Offense Out of Presence of Officer. – An officer may arrest without a warrant
any person who the officer has probable cause to believe:believe has
committed or violated any of the following:
a. Has committed a felony; orA felony.
*H230-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Has committed a misdemeanor, and:A misdemeanor, when the person
meets at least one of the following criteria:
1. Will not be apprehended unless immediately arrested,
orarrested.
2. May cause physical injury to himself or others, or damage to
property unless immediately arrested; orarrested.
c. Has committed a A misdemeanor under G.S. 14-72.1, 14-134.3,
20-138.1, or 20-138.2; or20-138.2.
d. Has committed a A misdemeanor under any of the following statutes:
1. G.S. 14-32.5.
2. G.S. 14-33(a), 14-33(c)(1), 14-33(c)(2), or 14-34 when the
offense was committed by a person with whom the alleged
victim has a personal relationship as defined in G.S. 50B-1;
orG.S. 50B-1.
e. Has committed a A misdemeanor under G.S. 50B-4.1(a);
orG.S. 50B-4.1(a).
f. Has violated a A pretrial release order entered under G.S. 15A-534 or
G.S. 15A-534.1(a)(2).
…."
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies
to offenses committed on or after that date. Section 2 of this act is effective when it becomes law
and applies to arrests made on or after that date. The remainder of this act is effective when it
becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 230-First Edition